dev/apertium-tat.tat.lexc
LEXICON CLIT-QST

%+мы%<qst%>:%>м%{I%} # ;
%+мыни%<qst%>:%>м%{I%}ни # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-MODASS

%+ла%<mod_ass%>:% л%{A%} # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-MODIND

%+дыр%<mod_ind%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р # ;
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-GHANA-ETC

%+гына%<postadv%>:% %{G%}%{I%}н%{A%} # ; ! ""
%+да%<cnjcoo%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! ""
%+да%<postadv%>:% %{D%}%{A%} # ; ! ""
%+ук%<postadv%>:% %{U%}к # ; ! ""
# ;

LEXICON CLIT-COPULA

%+и%<cop%>: V-PERS-S1 ;

! Now, let's group them depending on what they can attach to

LEXICON COMMON-CLITICS

CLIT-QST ;
CLIT-MODASS ;
CLIT-MODIND ;
CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ! Can appear only after nominals
                                 ! (and only after some cases).
COMMON-CLITICS ;
CLIT-COPULA ;

!==============================================================================!
!                         NOMINAL INFLECTION
! This section contains everyhing needed to describe inflection of nominals.
! It starts with the LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION
!==============================================================================!

!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! The following combinations are possible:
!
! stem(plural) > case                                     # әти<nom>, әтине<acc>
!----
! stem(plural) > possessives > case                       !# әтиемне<px1sg><acc>
! stem(plural) > possessives > ныкы/дагы/дай(*1)
                                               !# әтиемнеке,китабындагы,әтиемдәй
! stem(plural) > possessives > ныкы > case
! stem(plural) > possessives > дагы(plural(*2)) > case
                                   !# Монда _эчеңдәгене_ тышка чыгарырга ярамый.
! stem(plural) > possessives > дагы(plural) > possessives > case
                     !# _Эчендәгесе_(*3) – тышында, диләр андый кешеләр турында.
!----
! stem(plural) > ныкы/дагы/дай                         !# әтинеке/әтидәге/әтидәй
! stem(plural) > ныкы/дагы > case  !#Бу соңгы _еллардагының_ өчтән икесе чамасы.
!-----
! stem(plural) > сыз
! stem > сыз(plural) > case
! stem > сыз(plural) > possessives > case
!----
! *1. "ныкы" form in some Tatar grammars is called "predicative genitive".
!     Indeed, when not substantivized, it is used as a predicate:
!     "Бу яулык әнинеке." (vs "Әнинең яулыгы.)
!
!     Currently we don't mark it with a <subst> tag, but probably we should,
!     since we let it continue with case tags.
!
!     An alternative to a [predicative general possessive <px>] vs
!     [substantivized general possessive <px>subst>] opposition is to view it as
!     an always substantivized thing and hence mark it with a <subst> tag
!     (see e.g. http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Turkic_languages/Ki)
!     At the end of sentences it will have attached copulas, which will indicate
!     predicative use anyway.
! *2. TODO: Does double plural in a word make sence? Ерак илләрдәгеләр looks ok,
!     and occurs in the RFERL copus (though very rarely). Plural affix both
!     before and after the the general possessive does not look ok.
! *3. This doesn't work atm (it's recursive), but it doesn't seem to be very
!     frequent also.
!     Most likely it is restricted to px3sp.
!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------

!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------
! A note on abessive SIZ:
! It doesn't appear after possessives.
! Doesn't take personal copula suffixes. A counterexample could be e.g.
! "бәхет-сез-мен", but that's only because "бәхетсез" has lexicalized as an
! adjective >> FIXME CHECK this
! *Китапларсызлар is not legal, but китапларсыз and китапсызлар are correct.
!-------------------------------------------------------------------------------

LEXICON CASES-COMMON

%<gen%>:%>н%{I%}ң COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<acc%>:%>н%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON CASES

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;

LEXICON CASES-WITHOUT-COPULAS

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON ATTR-SUBST

%<attr%>: # ;
%<subst%>: CASES ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;

LEXICON GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC

!------------------------------------------------------------------------------!
! <n.pl.NIKI.pl> sequence should not be allowed. This form is rare (1 (!)
! match in RFERL corpus for 'ныкылар'), probably not worh bothering at all.
! It could be handled in a way abessive is handled, but since NIKI in contrast
! to the abessive SIZ can appear after possessves, that would require
! duplicatin possessives as well.
!------------------------------------------------------------------------------!

%<px%>:%>н%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;
%<px%>%<pl%>:%>н%{I%}к%{I%}%>л%{A%}р CASES ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} ATTR-SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON CASES-ETC

CASES ;
GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ;

LEXICON POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASES-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASES-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з CASES-ETC ;

! There is only one formal form in Tatar (which could be tagged
! as <px2sp><frm>), but having it duplicated as sg/pl seems to make
! translating into Kazakh easier (leaving room to disambiguate it
! somehow in CG)

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з CASES-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}г%{I%}з CASES-ETC ;

LEXICON ABESSIVE-SUBSTANTIVIZED

%+сыз%<post%>%<subst%>:%>с%{I%}з CASES-WITHOUT-COPULAS ;
%+сыз%<post%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}з%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-WITHOUT-COPULAS ;

LEXICON ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON PLURAL

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;

LEXICON FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION

PLURAL ;
CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;
ABESSIVE-POSTPOSITION ;
ABESSIVE-SUBSTANTIVIZED ;

!==============================================================================!
!                 ADJECTIVE'S (ADJECTIVIAL) INFLECTION
!
! FIXME: this section might need some refactoring
!! e.g. change <adj><comp><subst> to <adj><subst><comp>
!! and make use of COMPARATIVE continuation class
!==============================================================================!

LEXICON COMPARATIVE

%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON A1                ! adjectives that can be both substantivized and andverbialized;
                          ! all three readings (<adj>, <adj.subst> and <adj.advl>) have comparison levels.
                          !# яхшы, тиз

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;                        !# яхшы кеше
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;   !# яхшырак эш

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Яхшы яхшыны тудыра."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;        !# яхшыракны таптым

%<adj%>%<advl%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;                               !# "Тиз янган тиз сүнгән."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} COMMON-CLITICS ;          !# "Бәла бәхеттән тизрәк йөри."

LEXICON A2                 ! adjectives without adverbial reading;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.subst> readings have comparison levels.
                           !# иске

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;                        !# иске дус
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCLUDING-COPULA ;   !# искерәк версия

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Яңа булды дип, искене ташлама."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>р%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;        !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искерәге урынында утырадыр."

 LEXICON Adjectives
аксыл:аксыл A2 ; ! ""
аргы:аргы A2 ; ! ""
аулак:аулак A2 ; ! ""
ачы:ачы A2 ; ! ""
ашыгыч:ашыгыч A2 ; ! ""
башлы:башлы A2 ; ! ""
бәйсез:бәйсез A2 ; ! ""
бәяле:бәяле A2 ; ! ""
билгеле:билгеле A2 ; ! ""
гади:гади A2 ; ! ""
гаепле:гаепле A2 ; ! ""
газиз:газиз A2 ; ! ""
әһәмиятле:әһәмиятле A2 ; ! ""
әһәмиятсез:әһәмиятсез A2 ; ! ""
җитди:җитди A2 ; ! ""
инсафлы:инсафлы A2 ; ! ""
иясез:иясез A2 ; ! ""
катгый:катгый A2 ; ! ""
катлаулы:катлаулы A2 ; ! ""
кече:кече A2 ; ! ""
кодрәтле:кодрәтле A2 ; ! ""
күптәнге:күптәнге A2 ; ! ""
кызгылт:кызгылт A2 ; ! ""
кыйммәтле:кыйммәтле A2 ; ! ""
кыргый:кыргый A2 ; ! ""
лаек:лаек A2 ; ! ""
мөһим:мөһим A2 ; ! ""
нурлы:нурлы A2 ; ! ""
охшаш:охшаш A2 ; ! ""
өстен:өстен A2 ; ! ""
сазламык:сазламык A2 ; ! ""
тантаналы:тантаналы A2 ; ! ""
тартым:тартым A2 ; ! ""
тәкъва:тәкъва A2 ; ! ""
тиешле:тиешле A2 ; ! ""
төсле:төсле A2 ; ! ""
түгәрәк:түгәрәк A2 ; ! "round, circular"
түземле:түземле A2 ; ! ""
уртача:уртача A2 ; ! ""
үзсүзле:үзсүзле A2 ; ! ""
үләнчел:үләнчел A2 ; ! ""
хәерле:хәерле A2 ; ! ""
хәл% иткеч:хәл% иткеч A2 ; ! "" Use/MT
чыдам:чыдам A2 ; ! ""
шат:шат A2 ; ! ""
юаш:юаш A2 ; ! ""
юеш:юеш A2 ; ! ""
туклыклы:туклыклы A2 ; ! ""
уңдырышлы:уңдырышлы A2 ; ! ""
ярлы:ярлы A2 ; ! ""
нык:нык A2 ; ! ""
бөдрә:бөдрә A2 ; ! ""
өметле:өметле A2 ; ! ""
майлы:майлы A2 ; ! ""
тозлаклы:тозлаклы A2 ; ! ""
тозлы:тозлы A2 ; ! ""
авыр:авыр A1 ; ! ""
аграр:аграр A1 ; ! ""
административ:административ A1 ; ! ""
аз:аз A1 ; ! ""
азат:азат A1 ; ! ""
ак:ак A1 ; ! ""
актив:актив A1 ; ! ""
акыллы:акыллы A1 ; ! ""
ала:ала A1 ; ! ""
аллы:аллы A1 ; ! ""
алсу:алсу A1 ; ! ""
ансат:ансат A1 ; ! ""
арзан:арзан A1 ; ! ""
арык:арык A1 ; ! ""
аяз:аяз A1 ; ! ""
балигъ:балигъ A1 ; ! ""
бертуган:бертуган A1 ; ! ""
биек:биек A1 ; ! ""
борчулы:борчулы A1 ; ! ""
бурычлы:бурычлы A1 ; ! ""
бүтән:бүтән A1 ; ! "other"
гадел:гадел A1 ; ! ""
гомуми:гомуми A1 ; ! ""
даими:даими A1 ; ! ""
дини:дини A1 ; ! ""
ерак:ерак A1 ; ! ""
әйбәт:әйбәт A1 ; ! ""
әче:әче A1 ; ! ""
җай:җай A1 ; ! ""
җинаятьчел:җинаятьчел A1 ; ! ""
җирле:җирле A1 ; ! ""
заманча:заманча A1 ; ! ""
игътибарлы:игътибарлы A1 ; ! ""
изге:изге A1 ; ! ""
иңле:иңле A1 ; ! ""
иртә:иртә A1 ; ! ""
исән%-сау:исән%-сау A1 ; ! ""
искитмәле:искитмәле A1 ; ! ""
йомык:йомык A1 ; ! ""
калын:калын A1 ; ! ""
караңгы:караңгы A1 ; ! ""
керле:керле A1 ; ! "dirty"
ким:ким A1 ; ! ""
кирәкле:кирәкле A1 ; ! ""
коңгырт:коңгырт A1 ; ! ""
кояшлы:кояшлы A1 ; ! ""
көр:көр A1 ; ! ""
куе:куе A1 ; ! ""
куркыныч:куркыныч A1 ; ! ""
күренмәле:күренмәле A1 ; ! ""
кызганыч:кызганыч A1 ; ! ""
кызык:кызык A1 ; ! "fun, interesting"
кыйбат:кыйбат A1 ; ! ""
кырыс:кырыс A1 ; ! ""
максатлы:максатлы A1 ; ! ""
мескен:мескен A1 ; ! ""
мәңге:мәңге A1 ; ! ""
мохтаҗ:мохтаҗ A1 ; ! ""
начар:начар A1 ; ! ""
нәтиҗәле:нәтиҗәле A1 ; ! ""
нурсыз:нурсыз A1 ; ! ""
озак:озак A1 ; ! ""
очлы:очлы A1 ; ! ""
өстенлекле:өстенлекле A1 ; ! ""
рациональ:рациональ A1 ; ! ""
рәхимле:рәхимле A1 ; ! ""
салкын:салкын A1 ; ! ""
саф:саф A1 ; ! ""
сәяси:сәяси A1 ; ! ""
соргылт:соргылт A1 ; ! ""
сугышчан:сугышчан A1 ; ! ""
сыек:сыек A1 ; ! ""
таныш:таныш A1 ; ! ""
тематик:тематик A1 ; ! ""
тәмле:тәмле A1 ; ! ""
тиз:тиз A1 ; ! ""
тонык:тонык A1 ; ! ""
төнге:төнге A1 ; ! ""
төче:төче A1 ; ! ""
турыдан-туры A1 ; ! ""
түбән:түбән A1 ; ! ""
тынычсыз:тынычсыз A1 ; ! ""
унитар:унитар A1 ; ! ""
уң:уң A1 ; ! ""
урындагы:урындагы A1 ; ! ""
үзенә% бертөрле:үзенә% бертөрле A1 ; ! ""
үткер:үткер A1 ; ! ""
хаста:хаста A1 ; ! ""
хәрби:хәрби A1 ; ! ""
хокукый:хокукый A1 ; ! ""
чал:чал A1 ; ! ""
чирле:чирле A1 ; ! ""
чырайсыз:чырайсыз A1 ; ! ""
шәркый:шәркый A1 ; ! ""
шым:шым A1 ; ! ""
эссе:эссе A1 ; ! ""
юка:юка A1 ; ! ""
ягымлы:ягымлы A1 ; ! ""
ялгыз:ялгыз A1 ; ! ""
яңа:яңа A1 ; ! ""
ярык:ярык A1 ; ! ""
яшерен:яшерен A1 ; ! ""
берьяклы:берьяклы A1 ; ! ""
сак:сак A1 ; ! ""
ачык% төсле:ачык% төсле A1 ; ! ""
басылган:басылган A1 ; ! ""
берләштерелгән:берләштерелгән A1 ; ! ""
ватандаш:ватандаш A1 ; ! ""
дәүләт:дәүләт A1 ; ! ""
җемелдәп% торган:җемелдәп% торган A1 ; ! ""
зур% булмаган:зур% булмаган A1 ; ! ""
ирләргә% хас:ирләргә% хас A1 ; ! ""
махсуслашкан:махсуслашкан A1 ; ! ""
сөйгән:сөйгән A1 ; ! ""
таш:таш A1 ; ! ""
үлгән:үлгән A1 ; ! ""
эшче:эшче A1 ; ! ""
